Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2712
Association; recommend special deputy.

The association may recommend a natural person to serve as a special deputy to act for the director and under his supervision in the liquidation, rehabilitation, or conservation of any member insurer.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 12.